Idaho, session 2025, S1163.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-1801, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-1801. SHORT TITLE. This act chapter shall be known and may be cited
as the "Short-term Rental and Vacation Rental Tourism Revenue Protection
Act."
SECTION 2. That Section 63-1802, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-1802. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the legislature to
ensure that Idaho remains a prime tourism destination and to preserve and
enhance income to the state of Idaho and local jurisdictions from tourism.
The legislature finds that revenue from tourism is a vital source of income
to the state of Idaho and to cities and counties in Idaho and, therefore,
must be protected. This act is chapter is also designed to promote access to
short-term rentals and vacation rentals by limiting local governmental au-
thority to prohibit these beneficial property uses, or to specifically tar-
get them for regulation, except in circumstances necessary to safeguard pub-
lic health and welfare safety. This act is also Additionally, this chap-
ter is designed to preserve and protect constitutionally granted personal
property rights and promote property owner access to platforms for offering
their properties as short-term rentals and vacation rentals, and enhancing
local tax revenue by permitting platforms to assume tax collection and re-
mittance responsibilities.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 18, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-1805, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-1805. TOURISM REVENUE PROTECTION. (1) No county or city may enact
or enforce any ordinance that has the express or practical effect of pro-
hibiting any type of short-term rental or vacation rental in the county or


city. A county or city may implement reasonable regulations as are neces-
sary to safeguard public health and safety as long as the reasonable regu-
lations do not impose different restrictions or obligations on a short-term
rental than are imposed on single family dwellings or similar structures not
used as short-term rentals. For the purpose of this section, "different re-
strictions or obligations" means any requirement or regulation that would
not otherwise apply but for the property's use as a short-term rental. A
short-term rental shall be classified as a non-transient residential use for
zoning, fire, and building code purposes and shall be subject only to those
building codes adopted by the Idaho building code board as such codes apply
to other residential uses.
(2) All short-term rental properties and owners of such properties
shall be subject to all other county and city ordinances and penalties that
apply to other residential uses, including but not limited to noise, park-
ing, nuisance, curfew, traffic, and other similar regulations.
(3) No county or city shall regulate the operation of a short-term
rental marketplace as prohibited by the provisions of this chapter.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prevent a county or city from requir-
ing, by ordinance, a permit to operate a short-term rental as long as the per-
mitting ordinance does not impose requirements prohibited by this section.
(a) A short-term rental permit shall be issued if a short-term rental
owner:
(i) Submits payment of an annual fee not to exceed fifty dollars
($50.00) per property; and
(ii) Submits a statement certifying that within the twelve (12)
month period immediately preceding the application for a permit,
there have not been a combined total of three (3) or more convic-
tions on three (3) or more separate occasions by the property owner
or property manager for violating ordinances relating to such
short-term rental property.
(b) A county or city may only revoke a permit for a short-term rental
property if:
(i) A permit holder does not provide payment of the annual permit
fee if required by a county or city ordinance adopted pursuant to
paragraph (a) of this subsection; or
(ii) Within a twelve (12) month period there are a combined total
of three (3) or more convictions, on three (3) or more separate oc-
casions, by the property owner or property manager for violating
ordinances or laws related to such short-term rental property.
(5) The owner or operator of a short-term rental shall disclose to
prospective tenants prior to renting the short-term rental if the short-term
rental is not equipped with:
(a) An operating smoke alarm in every room advertised as a sleeping
area;
(b) An operating fire extinguisher on every floor; and
(c) A first aid kit.
SECTION 4. That Section 67-6539, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.